North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-59 Information Technology Department
54-59-22.1.
Required use of centralized desktop support services.

The following state agencies shall obtain centralized desktop support services from the information technology department:

Office of administrative hearings.

Office of the governor.

Commission on legal counsel for indigents.

Public employees retirement system.

North Dakota university system office.

Department of career and technical education.

Department of financial institutions.

Department of veterans’ affairs.

Aeronautics commission.

Council on the arts.

Agriculture commissioner.

Department of labor and human rights.

Indian affairs commission.

Protection and advocacy project.

Secretary of state.

State treasurer.

State auditor.

Securities department.

The office of management and budget, after receiving advice from the information technology department, shall establish policies and guidelines for the delivery of desktop support services, including the transition from existing systems to functional consolidation, with consideration given to the creation of efficiencies, cost-savings, and improved quality of service. For purposes of this section “desktop support services” means technical assistance and device management relating to the use of personal computers and peripheral devices.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 21, § 7, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 193, § 3, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2015.

54-59-23.
Information technology projects — Reports.

An executive, legislative, or judicial branch agency, except for institutions under the control of the state board of higher education, shall report to the state information technology advisory committee according to guidelines developed by the department and reviewed by the state information technology advisory committee regarding the plan for and status of any information technology project that is estimated to cost more than five hundred thousand dollars.

During the life of the project, the agency shall notify the state information technology advisory committee if:

At a project milestone, the amount expended on project costs exceeds the planned budget for that milestone by twenty percent or more; or

At a project milestone, the project schedule extends beyond the planned schedule to attain that milestone by twenty percent or more.

A report under subsection 2 must specify corrective measures being undertaken to address any cost or time of completion issue. If the agency has not taken adequate corrective measures within ninety days after the report, the agency shall submit a report to the legislative management’s information technology committee regarding the project.

Upon completion of the project, the agency shall notify the state information technology advisory committee if:

The budget for the project exceeded the original budget by twenty percent or more; or

The final project completion date extended beyond the original project scheduled completion date by twenty percent or more.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 536, § 2; 2009, ch. 482, § 88; 2013, ch. 412, § 3.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 412, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

54-59-24.
Borrowing authority — E-rate funding — Emergency commission approval.

Notwithstanding the limitations provided in section 54-59-05 and upon the approval of the emergency commission, the department may borrow from the Bank of North Dakota an amount necessary to pay telecommunications costs for connecting approved schools and libraries in the event e-rate funding is not received by the department from the schools and libraries division of the universal service administrative company. In addition to the principal repayment, the Bank of North Dakota is entitled to receive interest on the loan at a rate equal to other state agency borrowings. If at the end of the biennium a balance exists on any loan obtained pursuant to this section and funds are not anticipated to be available from the schools and libraries division of the universal service administrative company to repay the loan, the department shall request a deficiency appropriation from the legislative assembly to repay the loan.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 21, § 11.

54-59-25.
Health information technology advisory committee — Duties. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The health information technology advisory committee consists of the state chief information officer or the chief information officer's designee, the state health officer or the state health officer's designee, the governor or the governor's designee, the executive director of the department of human services or the executive director's designee, the chairman of the house human services committee and the chairman of the senate human services committee or if either or both of them are unwilling or unable to serve then the chairman of the legislative management shall appoint a replacement who is a member of the same legislative chamber as the individual being replaced, and individuals appointed by the governor to represent a broad range of public and private health information technology stakeholders. A committee member who is not an ex officio member, designee of an ex officio member, state employee, or legislator is entitled to mileage and expenses as provided by law for state officers and employees, to be paid by the health information technology office. A committee member who is an ex officio member, designee of an ex officio member, state employee, or legislator is entitled to receive that member's regular salary and receive mileage and expenses, to be paid by the employing agency.

The health information technology advisory committee shall collaborate with and make recommendations to the health information technology office, as provided under sections 6-09-43, 54-59-26, and 54-59-27.

As requested by the health information technology advisory committee, the department shall provide or arrange for administrative services to assist the health information technology advisory committee.

The health information technology advisory committee may employ an executive director who serves at the pleasure of and under the direct supervision of the health information technology advisory committee. The executive director may employ personnel as necessary for the administration of this section.

The health information technology advisory committee may accept private contributions, gifts, and grants from any source to carry out the purposes of the committee and the health information technology office.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 519, § 3; 2011, ch. 438, § 2; 2015, ch. 427, § 1, 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 427, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 427, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 54-59-25 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1 , the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 427, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2364; and Section 1 of Chapter 427, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2364.

54-59-25.
Health information technology advisory committee — Duties. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The health information technology advisory committee consists of the state chief information officer or the chief information officer's designee, the state health officer or the state health officer's designee, the governor or the governor's designee, the executive director of the department of health and human services or the executive director's designee, the chairman of the house human services committee and the chairman of the senate human services committee or if either or both of them are unwilling or unable to serve then the chairman of the legislative management shall appoint a replacement who is a member of the same legislative chamber as the individual being replaced, and individuals appointed by the governor to represent a broad range of public and private health information technology stakeholders. A committee member who is not an ex officio member, designee of an ex officio member, state employee, or legislator is entitled to mileage and expenses as provided by law for state officers and employees, to be paid by the health information technology office. A committee member who is an ex officio member, designee of an ex officio member, state employee, or legislator is entitled to receive that member's regular salary and receive mileage and expenses, to be paid by the employing agency

The health information technology advisory committee shall collaborate with and make recommendations to the health information technology office, as provided under sections 6-09-43, 54-59-26, and 54-59-27.

As requested by the health information technology advisory committee, the department shall provide or arrange for administrative services to assist the health information technology advisory committee.

The health information technology advisory committee may employ an executive director who serves at the pleasure of and under the direct supervision of the health information technology advisory committee. The executive director may employ personnel as necessary for the administration of this section.

The health information technology advisory committee may accept private contributions, gifts, and grants from any source to carry out the purposes of the committee and the health information technology office.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 519, § 3; 2011, ch. 438, § 2; 2015, ch. 427, § 1, 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 496, effective September 1, 2022.

54-59-26.
Health information technology office — Duties — Loan and grant programs. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The health information technology office is created in the department. The health information technology advisory committee shall make recommendations to the health information technology office for implementing an interoperable health information infrastructure that is consistent with emerging national standards; promote the adoption and use of electronic health records and other health information technologies; and promote interoperability of health information systems for the purpose of improving health care quality, patient safety, and the overall efficiency of health care and public health services.

The health information technology office director, in collaboration with the health information technology advisory committee, shall:

Apply for federal funds that may be available to assist the state and health care providers in implementing and improving health information technology.

Implement and administer a health information exchange that utilizes information infrastructure and systems in a secure and cost-effective manner to facilitate the collection, storage, and transmission of health records.

Adopt rules under chapter 28-32 for the use of health information, use of the health information exchange, and participation in the health information exchange.

Adopt rules under chapter 28-32 for accessing the health information exchange to ensure appropriate and required privacy and security protections and relating to the authority of the director to suspend, eliminate, or terminate the right to participate in the health information exchange.

Establish a health information technology planning loan program to provide low-interest loans to health care entities to assist those entities in improving their health information technology infrastructure under section 6-09-43.

Facilitate and expand electronic health information exchange in the state, directly or by awarding grants.

Establish an application process and eligibility criteria for and accept and process applications for loans and grants under subdivisions e and f. The eligibility criteria must be consistent with federal requirements associated with federal funds received under subdivision a. The eligibility criteria for loans under subdivision f must include a requirement that the recipient’s approved health information technology be strategically aligned with the state’s health information technology plan and the associated federal standards and that the recipient has passed an onsite electronic medical record readiness assessment conducted by an assessment team determined by the health information technology advisory committee and the health information technology office director.

Determine fees and charges for access and participation in the health information exchange. Any moneys collected under this subdivision must be deposited in the electronic health information exchange fund.

Consult and coordinate with the state department of health and the department of human services to facilitate the collection of health information from health care providers and state agencies for public health purposes, including identifiable health information that may be used by state agencies, departments, or institutions to comply with applicable state or federal laws.

If the health information technology advisory committee determines that establishing a health information exchange with another state or states will assist in providing health information exchange services in a cost-effective manner, the health information technology office director, in collaboration with the health information technology advisory committee, may join with another state or states to establish, implement, and administer a health information exchange consistent with other provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 519, § 4; 2011, ch. 438, § 3; 2015, ch. 427, §§
3, 4, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by sections 3 and 4 of chapter 427, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 54-59-26 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 4 of Chapter 427, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2364; and Section 3 of Chapter 427, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2364.

54-59-26.
Health information technology office — Duties — Loan and grant programs. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The health information technology office is created in the department. The health information technology advisory committee shall make recommendations to the health information technology office for implementing an interoperable health information infrastructure that is consistent with emerging national standards; promote the adoption and use of electronic health records and other health information technologies; and promote interoperability of health information systems for the purpose of improving health care quality, patient safety, and the overall efficiency of health care and public health services.

The health information technology office director, in collaboration with the health information technology advisory committee, shall:

Apply for federal funds that may be available to assist the state and health care providers in implementing and improving health information technology.

Implement and administer a health information exchange that utilizes information infrastructure and systems in a secure and cost-effective manner to facilitate the collection, storage, and transmission of health records.

Adopt rules under chapter 28-32 for the use of health information, use of the health information exchange, and participation in the health information exchange.

Adopt rules under chapter 28-32 for accessing the health information exchange to ensure appropriate and required privacy and security protections and relating to the authority of the director to suspend, eliminate, or terminate the right to participate in the health information exchange.

Establish a health information technology planning loan program to provide low-interest loans to health care entities to assist those entities in improving their health information technology infrastructure under section 6-09-43.

Facilitate and expand electronic health information exchange in the state, directly or by awarding grants.

Establish an application process and eligibility criteria for and accept and process applications for loans and grants under subdivisions e and f. The eligibility criteria must be consistent with federal requirements associated with federal funds received under subdivision a. The eligibility criteria for loans under subdivision f must include a requirement that the recipient’s approved health information technology be strategically aligned with the state’s health information technology plan and the associated federal standards and that the recipient has passed an onsite electronic medical record readiness assessment conducted by an assessment team determined by the health information technology advisory committee and the health information technology office director.

Determine fees and charges for access and participation in the health information exchange. Any moneys collected under this subdivision must be deposited in the electronic health information exchange fund.

Consult and coordinate with the department of health and human services to facilitate the collection of health information from health care providers and state agencies for public health purposes, including identifiable health information that may be used by state agencies, departments, or institutions to comply with applicable state or federal laws.

If the health information technology advisory committee determines that establishing a health information exchange with another state or states will assist in providing health information exchange services in a cost-effective manner, the health information technology office director, in collaboration with the health information technology advisory committee, may join with another state or states to establish, implement, and administer a health information exchange consistent with other provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 519, § 4; 2011, ch. 438, § 3; 2015, ch. 427, §§
3, 4, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 497, effective September 1, 2022.

54-59-27.
Health information technology office — Electronic health information exchange fund.

There is created an electronic health information exchange fund. The fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund from federal or other sources or moneys transferred into the fund as directed by the legislative assembly. The health information technology office shall administer this fund and shall distribute moneys in the fund accordingly. The moneys in the fund must be used to facilitate and expand electronic health information exchange. Moneys in the fund may be used, subject to legislative appropriations, to provide services directly, for grants as provided under this section, and for the costs of administration of the fund.

A grant applicant shall submit an application to the health information technology office, which shall determine the applicant’s eligibility based upon criteria established by the health information technology office director in collaboration with the health information technology advisory committee.

This section does not create an entitlement to any funds available for grants under this section. The health information technology office may award these grants to the extent funds are available and, within the office’s discretion, to the extent such applications are approved.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 519, § 5.

54-59-28.
Participation in the health information exchange by executive branch state agencies and institutions of higher education.

Before January 1, 2015, each executive branch state agency and each institution of higher education that implements, acquires, or upgrades health information technology systems shall use health information technology systems and products that meet minimum standards adopted by the health information technology office for accessing the health information exchange. A state agency or institution of higher education that participates in or has health information that supports or develops the health information exchange shall provide access to patient-specific data to complete the patient record within the health information exchange. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each participating agency and institution shall provide patient-specific data to the health information exchange.

Participation in the health information exchange by a state agency or institution has no effect on the content, use, or disclosure of health information of patient participants which is held in locations other than the exchange. This section does not limit or change the obligation of an agency or institution to exchange health information in accordance with other applicable federal and state laws or rules.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 438, § 4.

54-59-29.
Health information exchange — Confidential and exempt records.

Information submitted to, stored in, or transmitted by the health information exchange under this chapter and any such data or record in the possession of the health information technology office is an exempt record under chapter 44-04 unless the information is confidential under applicable federal or state law.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 438, § 5; 2015, ch. 427, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 427, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

54-59-30.
Immunity for reliance on data from the health information exchange.

A health care provider that relies in good faith upon any information provided through the health information exchange in the treatment of a patient is immune from criminal or civil liability arising from any damages caused by that good-faith reliance. The immunity granted under this section does not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or reckless, wanton, or intentional misconduct.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 438, § 6.

54-59-31.
Certified electronic health records systems.

An executive branch state agency, an institution of higher education, and any health care provider or other person participating in the health information exchange may use only an electronic health record system for use in the exchange which is certified under rules adopted by the office of the national coordinator for health information technology.

Subsection 1 does not apply if:

The office of the national coordinator for health information technology does not require certification of the electronic health record system for that type of provider; or

The North Dakota health information technology director waives the certification requirement.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 438, § 7; 2017, ch. 46, § 8, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This section becomes effective January 1, 2015.

54-59-32.
Major information technology projects — Appointment of executive steering committees.

An executive branch state agency, excluding institutions under the control of the state board of higher education, proposing to conduct a major information technology project as described in subsection 10 of section 54-35-15.2, the department, and the office of management and budget, in consultation with the attorney general, shall collaborate on the procurement, contract negotiation, and contract administration of the project. The agency, the department, and the office of management and budget, in consultation with the attorney general, shall approve the solicitation, contract, or agreement, and any amendments relating to the project before submission to the executive steering committee as provided in subsection 3.

The procurement officer and primary project manager for a major information technology project must meet the qualifications established by the department and the office of management and budget.

An executive steering committee must be appointed to oversee each major information technology project. The agency project sponsor shall serve as chairman of the committee. The executive steering committee must consist of the director of the office of management and budget or a designee of the director, the chief information officer or a designee of the officer, the head of the agency contracting for the project or a designee, the project sponsor, and a large project oversight analyst designated by the chief information officer. The executive steering committee shall monitor the overall status of the project and review project decisions, including negotiation and execution of contracts, approval of project budgets, implementation of project schedules, assessment of project quality, and consideration of scope changes. Any project decision declared by a member of the committee to be a major project decision requires at least four affirmative votes.

An agreement or contract, including an amendment, revision, or scope change, for a major information technology project may not be entered unless signed by the head of the contracting agency or a designee and the chief information officer or a designee of the officer.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 436, § 1.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2013.

54-59-33.
Statewide longitudinal data system committee — Membership. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The statewide longitudinal data system committee consists of:

The commissioner of the board of higher education or the commissioner’s designee;

The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent’s designee;

The chief information officer or the officer’s designee;

The director of the department of career and technical education or the director’s designee;

The director of job service North Dakota or the director’s designee;

The commissioner of commerce or the commissioner’s designee;

The director of the department of human services or the director’s designee;

The executive director of the North Dakota council of educational leaders or the executive director’s designee;

The director of the North Dakota workforce development council or the director’s designee; and

Two members of the legislative assembly appointed by the chairman of the legislative management.

The governor shall designate the chairman of the committee.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 141, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 144, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2015.

54-59-33.
Statewide longitudinal data system committee — Membership. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The statewide longitudinal data system committee consists of:

The commissioner of the board of higher education or the commissioner’s designee;

The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent’s designee;

The chief information officer or the officer’s designee;

The director of the department of career and technical education or the director’s designee;

The director of job service North Dakota or the director’s designee;

The commissioner of commerce or the commissioner’s designee;

The executive director of the department of health and human services or the director’s designee;

The executive director of the North Dakota council of educational leaders or the executive director’s designee;

The director of the North Dakota workforce development council or the director’s designee; and

Two members of the legislative assembly appointed by the chairman of the legislative management.

The governor shall designate the chairman of the committee.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 141, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 144, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 498, effective September 1, 2022.

54-59-34.
Statewide longitudinal data system committee — Duties.

The statewide longitudinal data system committee shall manage a statewide longitudinal data system that:

Provides for the dissemination of management information to stakeholders and partners of state education, training, and employment systems;

Is required to provide on an annual basis to education and workforce development programs, to the extent permitted by federal law, the wage record interchange system 2 data sharing agreement and the state wage interchange system data sharing agreement and state performance reports that measure the aggregate outcomes of participants in the workforce and continuing education programs, including private workforce and education programs that request the reports; and

Uses data from educational and workforce systems as central sources of statewide longitudinal data.

The statewide longitudinal data system committee shall establish policies and adopt rules addressing access to and the collection, storage, and sharing of information and the systems necessary to perform those functions, subject to applicable federal and state privacy laws and interagency agreements and restrictions relating to confidential information required to conform to applicable federal and state privacy laws.

The statewide longitudinal data system committee shall provide operational oversight for information sharing activities and make recommendations for and provide oversight of information sharing budgets.

The statewide longitudinal data system committee in consultation with the information technology department shall:

Establish the terms and conditions under which a person may be authorized to access data through the statewide longitudinal data system;

Direct that all statewide longitudinal data system administrators implement approved data protection practices to ensure the security of electronic and physical data, provided that the practices include requirements for encryption and staff training;

Provide for biennial privacy and security audits of the statewide longitudinal data system;

Establish protocols, including procedures, for the notification of students and parents in the event of a data breach involving the statewide longitudinal data system;

Require that data retention and disposition by the statewide longitudinal data system be governed by the same policies as those instituted for the information technology department; and

Require the provision of annual training regarding data protection to any individuals who have access to the statewide longitudinal data system, including school district employees, employees of the North Dakota university system office and institutions under the control of the state board of higher education, and elected or appointed state or local governmental officials.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 141, § 3, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 46, § 9, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2015.

54-59-35.
Statewide longitudinal data system committee — Powers.

The statewide longitudinal data system committee may authorize studies to benefit and improve workforce training and education.

The statewide longitudinal data system committee may appoint additional work groups and task forces to serve in an advisory capacity.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 141, § 4, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2015.

54-59-36.
Statewide longitudinal data system committee — Report to legislative management.

During each interim the statewide longitudinal data system committee shall provide a report regarding the statewide longitudinal data system to one or more committees designated by the legislative management and shall provide recommendations for further development, cost proposals, proposals for legislation, and recommendations for data sharing governance.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 141, § 5, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2015.

54-59-37.
Statewide longitudinal data system committee — Continuing appropriation.

The statewide longitudinal data system committee may solicit and receive gifts, grants, and donations from public and private sources. Any moneys received in accordance with this section are appropriated on a continuing basis for the support of the statewide longitudinal data system.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 141, § 6, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2015.

54-59-38.
Statewide longitudinal data system committee — Information technology department.

The information technology department, at the direction of the statewide longitudinal data system committee, shall maintain a statewide longitudinal data system among education, workforce, and training entities.

The information technology department and the statewide longitudinal data system committee may, subject to federal and state privacy laws, enter interagency agreements, including agreements designating authorized representatives of the educational agencies participating in the system, pursuant to the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act [20 U.S.C. 1232G; 34 CFR 99].

The information technology department shall staff and provide other necessary support to the statewide longitudinal data system committee.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 141, § 7, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2015.

54-59-39.
State agencies — Mandatory provision of information — Confidentiality.

The information technology department may request from any state agency:

All information required by 20 U.S.C. 9871(e)(2)(D);

Any other educational information the statewide longitudinal data system committee determines is required for a longitudinal data system to comply with state or federal law; and

Unemployment insurance wage data from job service North Dakota for education and workforce development program evaluations, except that the information technology department may not redisclose any data identifying an individual unless the redisclosure is expressly permitted by a written agreement between job service North Dakota and the department or is otherwise expressly permitted or required by federal or state law.

Subject to applicable restrictions on the use and disclosure of confidential information required to comply with federal and state privacy laws, any state agency receiving a request for information under subsection 1 shall provide the information at the time and in the manner required by the information technology department.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 141, § 8, effective July 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 21, § 6, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 374, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 21, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

This section became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 54-39-59 was enacted and amended by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 6 of Chapter 21, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1021; and Section 8 of Chapter 141, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2326.